Hawaii, session 2026, GM1348.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that an estimated
twenty-five thousand elderly individuals in Hawaii who require
in-home health care or support services and do not qualify for
existing programs, such as medicaid, cannot afford in-home care
services.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to establish a one-
year KupunAloha pilot program within the department of health to
provide in-home health care and support services for individuals
who do not qualify for existing government programs and cannot
otherwise afford these services.
SECTION 2. (a) There is established within the department
of health a one-year KupunAloha pilot program to provide in-home
health care and support services for eligible individuals who do
not otherwise qualify for government assistance for these
services.
(b) In implementing the pilot program, the department
shall create a plan of care for each eligible applicant. The
2026-3471 HB1973 CDl HMSO
iniiHiniiiiiiiiiiii

Page 2 1973
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
department may refer eligible applicants to health care
providers.
(c) The pilot program may enter into contracts with health
care providers to effectuate the purposes of this Act. Any
contract executed pursuant to this Act shall be subject to
chapter 103F, Hawaii Revised Statutes.
(d) An individual shall not be considered eligible for the
KupunAloha pilot program if:
(1) The individual is covered by medicaid or any other
government assistance program for in-home health care
or support services;
(2) The individual does not meet the income requirements
for the program established by the department; or
(3) The individual does not meet the need criteria for the
program established by the department.
(e) The KupunAloha pilot program shall cease to exist on
June 30, 2027.
SECTION 3. The department of health shall submit a report
on the effectiveness of the KupunAloha pilot program established
pursuant to this Act to the legislature no later than twenty
days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2027. The
2026-3471 HB1973 CDl HMSO
nwniMiiiniiiiiwi

Page 3 1973
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
report shall also include recommendations to improve the
efficiency of the KupunAloha pilot program and whether the
program should be made permanent.
SECTION 4. There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $2,000,000 or so much
thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the
implementation and operation of the KupunAloha pilot program.
The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of
health for the purposes of this Act.
SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
2026-3471 HB1973 CDl HMSO
HlilllilinilHIiHI

H.B. NO.
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 14th day of July , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1973, HD 1, SD 1, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 1973, H.D. 1, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
176-26